Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

General Provisions

6-31-101. Method of electing governing body.

All corporate, legislative, and other powers of the city, except as otherwise provided in chapters 30-36 of this title, shall be vested in a council, and the council shall be composed of members to be elected as provided in this section: One (1) member of the council shall be elected from each voting precinct of the incorporated area, to be voted on exclusively by the members of that particular voting precinct, and no person not a resident of the voting precinct shall be eligible to run for the office of council member from that voting precinct. In the event the incorporated area takes in a portion or a part of a voting precinct, that portion or part shall be considered, so far as this section is concerned, as a complete voting precinct. For the purposes of complying with chapter 30 of this title, each voting precinct shall be known as a councilmanic district.

If an area to be incorporated, or that has been incorporated under chapters 30-36 of this title, lies in two (2) or more counties, the county election commissions of the counties in which the area lies shall jointly conduct elections under chapters 30-36 of this title.

If the area to be incorporated includes inactive voting precincts or portions of inactive voting precincts, or both, the inactive voting precinct or portions of the inactive precincts, or both, shall be included in a contiguous voting precinct. An inactive precinct is one in which a general state election has not been held for five (5) years prior to the date of filing the petition for incorporation.

In no event shall the membership of the council be less than seven (7), and in the event there are not sufficient voting precincts to elect a minimum of seven (7) members, the additional members of the council shall be elected at large. Council members from the city at large shall be voted on by the electors in all voting precincts.

Any city operating under this charter may elect all such council members from the city at large, at its option. The option may be exercised by a private act of the general assembly providing for such when ratified as provided for by article XI, § 9 of the Constitution of Tennessee.

Election to the board of education shall be as provided in chapter 36 of this title.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.01; 1959, ch. 321, § 1; 1969, ch. 322, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(49); T.C.A., § 6-3101.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey, 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1257 (1959).

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-31-102. Time of election of council members.

The first election of council members in any city incorporating under chapters 30-36 of this title shall be had on the fourth Tuesday following the election at which chapters 30-36 of this title have been adopted, and a regular municipal election shall be held biennially thereafter.

Any city operating under this charter may change the date of holding its regular biennial municipal election from the date provided in subsection (a) to the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, to coincide with the election of members of the general assembly and representatives in the congress of the United States, as provided in § 2-3-203 or to coincide with the August general election. This option may be exercised by ordinance duly adopted in accordance with § 6-32-202. The ordinance changing the election date shall provide for the extension of the terms of council members necessary to meet the election date, but no term may be extended for more than two (2) years beyond its regular expiration date.

Nothing in subdivision (b)(1) shall be construed to remove any incumbent from office or abridge the term of any incumbent prior to the end of the term for which an elected official was selected.

If the council changes the date of municipal elections pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), the council may at a later date change the election date back to what such date was prior to moving the election date to coincide with the August or November general election. The council may only make an election date change under this subdivision (b)(3) one (1) time. Terms of incumbent council members shall not be abridged to accomplish an election date change under this subsection (b); however, council members elected at a date change pursuant to this subsection (b) may take office at a later date so as to not abridge terms of incumbent council members. If such council members take office at a later date, their term may be abridged due to such members having to take office at the later date.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.02; 1971, ch. 69, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 6-3102; Acts 2010, ch. 1008, § 3.

6-31-103. Qualifications for voting.

In any election under this charter, registered voters of the city or territory may vote.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.03; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(50); T.C.A., § 6-3103.

6-31-104. Nonpartisanship.

All elections shall be nonpartisan.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.04; 1959, ch. 139, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(51); T.C.A., § 6-3105.

6-31-105. Eligibility for office of council member.

Any qualified voter of the city is eligible for election to the office of council member; provided, that such voter has been a resident of the city for one (1) year next preceding the day of election; and provided further, that before taking office, the voter resigns any state, county, or other municipal office or position of employment that is filled by public election or that is remunerative, except as a notary public or member of the national guard.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.05; T.C.A., § 6-3106.

6-31-106. Deadline for councilmanic nominations.

The deadline for filing nominating petitions for the first councilmanic election after incorporation is thirty-five (35) days before the councilmanic election will be held.

Acts 1957, ch. 237, § 3.06; 1961, ch. 267, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(52); T.C.A., § 6-3107.

6-31-107. Term of office.

The terms of council members elected at this and all succeeding elections for the office of council shall be four (4) years. However at the option of the council, an ordinance may be adopted by two thirds (2/3) of the entire membership of the council prescribing and fixing staggered terms for members of the council, and the ordinance may shorten or extend the terms of current members of the council for the sole purpose of staggering the terms, but otherwise the terms of office shall be four (4) years.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.07; 1959, ch. 139, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3108; Acts 1993, ch. 353, § 4.

6-31-108. Restrictions on candidates and supporters — Penalty.

If a candidate or any person on such candidate's behalf directly or indirectly gives or promises to any person or persons any office, employment, money, benefit, or anything of value in connection with such candidate's candidacy, upon conviction thereof such person shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00), and shall thereafter be ineligible to hold any office or position of employment in the city government for a period of five (5) years.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.08; T.C.A., § 6-3109.

6-31-109. Certification of election.

The county election commission or county election commissions shall determine and declare the results of the election and shall certify the results of the election. The chair of the county election commission or the chairs shall by mail send notices of election to the elected candidates, indicating the term to be served by each. A notice of the certification shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the city.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.09; 1963, ch. 389, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(53); T.C.A., § 6-3110.

6-31-110. Expenses of election.

All expenses of the election shall be borne and paid by the city within six (6) months after the election.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.10; T.C.A., § 6-3111.

6-31-111. Time of taking office.

Persons elected to the office of council member shall take office the second Tuesday after the election at twelve o'clock (12:00) noon.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.11; T.C.A., § 6-3112.

6-31-112. Oath of office — Bond.

Every officer or employee before taking any office in the city government shall take, subscribe to and file with the city clerk the following oath or affirmation:

“I solemnly swear (or affirm) that I possess all the qualifications prescribed for the office (or position) of , as prescribed by this charter, and that I will support the Constitution and will obey the laws of the United States and of the state of Tennessee, that I will, in all respects, observe the provisions of the charter and ordinances of the city of , and that I will faithfully discharge the duties of the office (or position) of .”

Any bond that may be required by law shall be filed with the oath or affirmation in subsection (a) in the office of the city clerk; provided, that the first seven (7) council members elected shall file the oath with the county mayor of the county wherein the city is located. Failure to comply with this section within ten (10) days from the date of election or appointment shall vacate the office involved, unless the council shall, by resolution, extend the time for qualifying.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.12; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 6-3113; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.